District of Columbia statutes.
5-114.04

Report on enforcement of compulsory insurance requirements.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall annually publish and submit to the Council and to the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking a report on the effectiveness of enforcement of the requirements of compulsory motor vehicle insurance. The Mayor shall direct the appropriate agencies to provide the Metropolitan Police Department with the information needed to compile the report. The report shall include:

(1)

Statistics regarding:

(A)

The number of notices of infraction (“NOI”) issued for failure to produce proof of insurance upon demand, and the number of such NOls subsequently dismissed; and

(B)

The number of NOls for failure to maintain the required insurance, and the number of such NOls subsequently dismissed; and

(2)

An evaluation of the effectiveness of enforcement, including any recommendations for improvements to enforcement of compliance with compulsory insurance requirements.

(b)

The report shall be on a calendar-year basis and shall be transmitted to the Council and the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking by January 31st, with the first report due January 31, 2007.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-117, § 104, 53 DCR 2548

History